Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE X. DISTRICTS WITH COMBINED POWERS

CHAPTER 11011. THE WOODLANDS TOWNSHIP

Sec. 11011.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means The Woodlands Township.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 5, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 11011.002. LAW GOVERNING DISTRICT. The district is governed by this chapter and Chapter 289, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 5, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 11011.003. DISSOLUTION OF DISTRICT. (a) If at least 99 percent of the territory of the district is incorporated and the district is dissolved in the manner provided by Section 14A, Chapter 289, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993, only the following sections of Chapter 289, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993, apply to the municipality in addition to any applicable general law provisions, a reference in those sections to the district means the municipality, and a reference in those sections to the board or board of directors means the governing body of the municipality:

(1) Sections 6(a) and (c);

(2) Sections 7(a), (b), (c), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (l), (n), (o), (p), (q), (r), (t), (u), (v), (w), (y), (z), and (aa);

(3) Section 7H;

(4) Sections 9(h)(3), (4), and (5);

(5) Section 11;

(6) Section 11A;

(7) Section 11B;

(8) Section 11B-1;

(9) Section 11C;

(10) Sections 12A(a), (c), (d), (e), and (f); and

(11) Section 13.

(b) The remaining provisions of Chapter 289, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993, do not apply to the municipality after the dissolution of the district.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 1014), Sec. 5, eff. June 9, 2017.